Illinois, session 104th, HB4750.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the Mental 5Health Warning for Social Media Act. 6    Section 5. Definitions. As used in this Act:7    "Clear and conspicuous" has the meaning set forth in 8Section 5 of Automatic Contract Renewal Act. 9    "Social media platform" means a public or semi-public 10Internet-based service or application that has users in this 11State and that meets the following criteria:12        (1) a substantial function of the service or 13    application is to connect users in order to allow users to 14    interact socially with each other within the service or 15    application; and16        (2) the service or application allows users to do the 17    following:18            (A) construct a public or semi-public profile for 19        purposes of signing into and using the service or 20        application;21            (B) populate a list of other users with whom an 22        individual shares a social connection within the 23        system; and  HB4750- 2 -LRB104 17909 SPS 31345 b1            (C) create or post content viewable by other 2        users, including, but not limited to, on message 3        boards, in chat rooms, or through a landing page or 4        main feed that presents the user with content 5        generated by other users.6    For the purpose of this definition, a service or 7application that provides email or direct messaging services 8shall not be considered a "social media platform" on the basis 9of that function alone.10    "User" means a person that uses a social media platform 11while located in this State. 12    Section 10. Mental health warning label required.13    (a) The operator of a social media platform shall ensure 14that a clear and conspicuous mental health warning label that 15complies with the requirements of subsection (b):16        (1) appears each time a user accesses the social media 17    platform; and18        (2) remains visible until the user:19            (A) exits the social media platform; or20            (B) acknowledges the potential for harm and 21        chooses to proceed to the social media platform.22    (b) A mental health warning label required under 23subsection (a) shall:24        (1) warn the user of potential negative mental health 25    impacts of accessing the social media platform in a manner   HB4750- 3 -LRB104 17909 SPS 31345 b1    consistent with the guidelines set forth under Section 15; 2    and3        (2) provide the user access to resources to address 4    the potential negative mental health impacts described in 5    paragraph (1) and include the website and telephone number 6    of a national suicide prevention and mental health crisis 7    hotline system, including, but not limited to, the 9-8-8 8    Suicide and Crisis Lifeline.9    (c) The operator of a social media platform shall not:10        (1) provide the warning label exclusively in the 11    social media platform's terms and conditions;12        (2) include extraneous information in the warning 13    label that obscures the visibility or prominence of the 14    warning label; or15        (3) allow a user to disable a warning label, except as 16    provided under paragraph (2) of subsection (a). 17    Section 15. Content of mental health warning label. The 18Department of Public Health shall develop guidelines for the 19warning labels required under Section 10. The guidelines shall 20be based on current evidence regarding the negative mental 21health impacts of social media platforms. The Department of 22Public Health shall review and revise the guidelines as 23appropriate. 24    Section 20. Pop-up timer required.   HB4750- 4 -LRB104 17909 SPS 31345 b1    (a) Except as provided under subsection (b), the operator 2of a social media platform shall display a clear and 3conspicuous pop-up notification at least once every 30 minutes 4that a user has actively used the platform. The notification 5shall:6        (1) inform the user that the user has actively used 7    the platform for the relevant consecutive period of time;8        (2) inform the user of the total time the user has 9    actively used the platform that day; and10        (3) remain visible until the user acknowledges the 11    notification.12    (b) The operator of a social media platform may allow a 13user to:14        (1) deactivate the notification required under 15    subsection (a); or16        (2) customize the period of time resulting in the 17    notification required under subsection (a), provided that 18    the maximum time period does not exceed 60 minutes. 19    Section 25. Enforcement. A violation of any of the 20provisions of this Act is an unlawful practice under the 21Consumer Fraud and Deceptive Business Practices Act. All 22remedies, penalties, and authority granted to the Attorney 23General by that Act shall be available to the Attorney General 24for the enforcement of this Act.   HB4750- 5 -LRB104 17909 SPS 31345 b1    Section 30. Rulemaking. The Department of Public Health 2may adopt rules necessary to implement and administer this 3Act. 4    Section 90. The Consumer Fraud and Deceptive Business 5Practices Act is amended by adding Section 2MMMM as follows: 6    (815 ILCS 505/2MMMM new)7    Sec. 2MMMM. Violations of the Mental Health Warning for 8Social Media Act.9    (a) A person who violates the Mental Health Warning for 10Social Media Act commits an unlawful practice within the 11meaning of this Act.12    (b) The provisions of Section 10a do not apply to a 13violation of this Section.